test/src/dict-gt-yamls/V-lex_njihhood_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 


  Verb - njihhoođ: # ML checked
    njihhoođ+V+Inf: njihhoođ
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njiˊṿom
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: njiˊṿoh
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njiˊho
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: njihhoon
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: njiˊhovettee
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: njihhoov
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: njihhoop
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: njiˊhovetteđ
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: njiˊhoh
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: njiihum
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: njiihuh
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: njiˊṿoi
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: njivvoim
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: njivvoid
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: njivvoin
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: njivvoim
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: njivvoid
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: njihhuu
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Sg1: njiˊṿoččim
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Sg2: njiˊṿoččih
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Sg3: njiˊṿoččij
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Du1: njiˊṿoččáim
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Du2: njiˊṿoččáid
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Du3: njiˊṿoččáin
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Pl1: njiˊṿoččijm
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Pl2: njiˊṿoččijd
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+Pl3: njiˊṿoččii
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Sg1: njivvoom
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Sg2: njivvooh
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Sg3: njivvooš
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Du1: njiˊṿožeen
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Du2: njivvoošvettee
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Du3: njiˊṿožává
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Pl1: njiˊṿožep
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Pl2: njivvoošvetteđ
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+Pl3: njiˊṿožeh
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Sg1: njihhoom
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Sg2: njiˊṿo
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Sg3: njiˊṿos
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Du1: njihhoon
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Du2: njihhoo
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Du3: njihhoos
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Pl1: njihhoop
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Pl2: njihhoođ
    njihhoođ+V+Imprt+Pl3: njihhoos
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: njiˊṿo
    njihhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: njihhoom
    njihhoođ+V+Cond+ConNeg: njiˊṿoččii
    njihhoođ+V+Pot+ConNeg: njivvuu
    njihhoođ+V+PrsPrc: njihhoo
    njihhoođ+V+PrfPrc: njihhoom
    njihhoođ+V+Actio: njihhoom
    njihhoođ+V+Actio+Ess: njiˊhomin
    njihhoođ+V+Actio+Loc: njiˊhomist
    njihhoođ+V+Actio+Ill: njiˊhomân
    njihhoođ+V+Ger: njiˊṿodijn
    njihhoođ+V+VAbess: njiˊṿohánnáá


  Verb - orroođ: # ML checked
    orroođ+V+Inf: orroođ
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oˊrom
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: oˊroh
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oˊṛo
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: orroon
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: oˊṛovettee
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: orroov
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: orroop
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: oˊṛovetteđ
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: oˊṛoh
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: uurrum
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: uurruh
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: oˊroi
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: oˊroim
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: oˊroid
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: oˊroin
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: oˊroim
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: oˊroid
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: urruu
    orroođ+V+Cond+Sg1: oˊroččim
    orroođ+V+Cond+Sg2: oˊroččih
    orroođ+V+Cond+Sg3: oˊroččij
    orroođ+V+Cond+Du1: oˊroččáim
    orroođ+V+Cond+Du2: oˊroččáid
    orroođ+V+Cond+Du3: oˊroččáin
    orroođ+V+Cond+Pl1: oˊroččijm
    orroođ+V+Cond+Pl2: oˊroččijd
    orroođ+V+Cond+Pl3: oˊroččii
    orroođ+V+Pot+Sg1: ooroom
    orroođ+V+Pot+Sg2: oorooh
    orroođ+V+Pot+Sg3: oorooš
    orroođ+V+Pot+Du1: oˊrožeen
    orroođ+V+Pot+Du2: ooroošvettee
    orroođ+V+Pot+Du3: oˊrožává
    orroođ+V+Pot+Pl1: oˊrožep
    orroođ+V+Pot+Pl2: ooroošvetteđ
    orroođ+V+Pot+Pl3: oˊrožeh
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Sg1: orroom
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Sg2: oˊro
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Sg3: oˊros
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Du1: orroon
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Du2: orroo
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Du3: orroos
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Pl1: orroop
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Pl2: orroođ
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Pl3: orroos
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: oˊro
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: orroom
    orroođ+V+Cond+ConNeg: oˊroččii
    orroođ+V+Pot+ConNeg: urruu
    orroođ+V+PrsPrc: orroo
    orroođ+V+PrfPrc: orroom
    orroođ+V+Actio: orroom
    orroođ+V+Actio+Ess: oˊṛomin
    orroođ+V+Actio+Loc: oˊṛomist
    orroođ+V+Actio+Ill: oˊṛomân
    orroođ+V+Ger: oˊrodijn
    orroođ+V+VAbess: oˊrohánnáá

  Verb - vahhoođ: # ML checked
    vahhoođ+V+Inf: vahhoođ
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vaˊṿom
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vaˊṿoh
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaˊho
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vahhoon
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: vaˊhovettee
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: vahhoov
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vahhoop
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vaˊhovetteđ
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vaˊhoh
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vooḥum
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vooḥuh
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vaˊṿoi
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: vavvoim
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: vavvoid
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: vavvoin
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vavvoim
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vavvoid
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vohhuu
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Sg1: vaˊṿoččim
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Sg2: vaˊṿoččih
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Sg3: vaˊṿoččij
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Du1: vaˊṿoččáim
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Du2: vaˊṿoččáid
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Du3: vaˊṿoččáin
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Pl1: vaˊṿoččijm
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Pl2: vaˊṿoččijd
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+Pl3: vaˊṿoččii
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Sg1: vavvoom
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Sg2: vavvooh
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Sg3: vavvooš
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Du1: vaˊṿožeen
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Du2: vavvoošvettee
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Du3: vaˊṿožává
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Pl1: vaˊṿožep
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Pl2: vavvoošvetteđ
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+Pl3: vaˊṿožeh
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Sg1: vahhoom
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Sg2: vaˊṿo
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Sg3: vaˊṿos
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Du1: vahhoon
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Du2: vahhoo
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Du3: vahhoos
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Pl1: vahhoop
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Pl2: vahhoođ
    vahhoođ+V+Imprt+Pl3: vahhoos
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vaˊṿo
    vahhoođ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: vahhoom
    vahhoođ+V+Cond+ConNeg: vaˊṿoččii
    vahhoođ+V+Pot+ConNeg: vovvuu
    vahhoođ+V+PrsPrc: vahhoo
    vahhoođ+V+PrfPrc: vahhoom
    vahhoođ+V+Actio: vahhoom
    vahhoođ+V+Actio+Ess: vaˊhomin
    vahhoođ+V+Actio+Loc: vaˊhomist
    vahhoođ+V+Actio+Ill: vaˊhomân
    vahhoođ+V+Ger: vaˊṿodijn
    vahhoođ+V+VAbess: vaˊṿohánnáá
